Utah statutes.
20A-2-305.   Removing names from the official register -- General
requirements.
(1)  The county clerk may not remove a voter's name from the official register
because the voter has failed to vote in an election.
(2)  The county clerk may remove a voter's name from the official register
only when:
(a)  the voter dies and the requirements of Subsection (3) are met;
(b)  the county clerk, after complying with the requirements of Section
20A-2-306, receives written confirmation from the voter that the voter no
longer resides within the county clerk's county;
(c)  the county clerk has obtained evidence that the voter's residence has
changed, has mailed notice to the voter as required by Section 20A-2-306 and
received no response from the voter, and the voter has failed to vote or
appear to vote in either of the next two regular general elections following
the date of the notice;
(d)  the voter requests, in writing, that his name be removed from the
official register; or
(e)  the county clerk receives a returned voter identification card,
determines that there was no clerical error causing the card to be returned,
and has no further information to contact the voter.
(3)  The county clerk may remove a voter's name from the registration list
upon the annual receipt of a listing of all deceased residents from the
Department of Health's Bureau of Vital Records.
